src/chrome/test/data/convert_dict/indexed-affix.aff
# This file exercises "continuation classes", whereby an affix can declare that
# it may be followed by another affix. This file declares two affixes:
#   "s", which may be applied to any ADJECTIVE (i.e. "wearable" -> "wearables")
#   "able", which may be applied to any VERB (i.e. "wear" -> "wearable")

SFX ADJECTIVE Y 1
SFX ADJECTIVE 0 s .

SFX VERB Y 1
SFX VERB 0 able/ADJECTIVE .
